Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 15

Liquidation, Dissolution, and Reorganization

45-2-1501. Voluntary liquidation and dissolution.

With the approval of the commissioner, a state bank may liquidate and dissolve. The commissioner shall grant approval if it appears that:

The proposal to liquidate and dissolve has been approved by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock at a meeting called for the purpose of considering the action; and

The state bank is solvent and has sufficient liquid assets to pay off depositors and creditors immediately.

Upon approval by the commissioner, the bank shall cease to do business, shall have only the powers necessary to effect an orderly liquidation and shall proceed to pay its depositors and creditors and to wind up its affairs.

Within thirty (30) days of the approval, a notice of liquidation shall be sent by mail to each depositor, creditor, person interested in funds held as a fiduciary, lessee of a safe deposit box or bailor of property. The notice shall be posted conspicuously on the premises of the bank and shall be published as the commissioner may require. The bank shall send with the notice a statement of the amount on the books to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice shall demand that property held by the bank as bailee or in a safe deposit box be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and that claims of depositors and creditors, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the bank before a specified date not earlier than sixty (60) days thereafter in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

As soon after approval as may be practicable, the state bank shall resign all fiduciary positions and take the actions necessary to settle its fiduciary accounts.

Safe deposit boxes, the contents of which have not been removed within thirty (30) days after demand, shall be opened and the contents dealt with in the manner provided for boxes upon which the payment of rental is in default and the sealed packages containing the contents and the certificates, together with any other unclaimed property held by the bank as bailee and certified inventories thereof, shall be reported to the state treasurer, who shall act in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29.

The approval of an application for liquidation shall not impair any right of a depositor or creditor to payment in full, and all lawful claims of creditors and depositors shall promptly be paid. The unearned portion of the rental of a safe deposit box shall be returned to the lessee.

Any assets remaining after the discharge of all obligations shall be distributed to the stockholders, in accordance with their respective interests. Distribution shall not be made before:

All claims of depositors and creditors have been paid or, in the case of any disputed claim, the bank has transmitted to the commissioner a sum adequate to meet any liability that may be judicially determined; and

Any funds payable to a depositor or creditor and unclaimed have been transmitted to the commissioner. Any unclaimed distribution to a stockholder or depositor shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall deal with the unclaimed funds in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29.

If the commissioner finds that the assets will be insufficient for the full discharge of all obligations or that completion of the liquidation has been unduly delayed, the commissioner may take possession and complete the liquidation in the manner provided in § 45-2-1504 for involuntary liquidations.

The commissioner may require reports of the progress of liquidation, and whenever satisfied that the liquidation has been properly completed, the commissioner shall cancel the charter and enter an order of dissolution.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.501); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1978, ch. 561, § 34; T.C.A., § 45-901; Acts 1983, ch. 78, §§ 9, 10; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Cross-References. Applicability of part to industrial banks and industrial investment companies, §45-5-602.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 56, 60.

45-2-1502. Commissioner in possession.

The commissioner may take possession of a state bank if, after a hearing, the commissioner finds:

Its capital is impaired or it is otherwise in an unsound condition;

Its business is being conducted in an unlawful or unsound manner;

It is unable to continue normal operations; or

Its examination has been obstructed or impeded.

The commissioner shall take possession by posting upon the premises a notice reciting that the commissioner is assuming possession pursuant to this section and the time, not earlier than the posting of the notice, when possession shall be deemed to commence. A copy of the notice shall be filed in a court of general or equity jurisdiction in the county in which the institution is located. The commissioner shall notify the federal reserve bank of the district of taking possession of any state bank that is a member of the federal reserve system, and shall notify the federal deposit insurance corporation of the taking possession of any insured bank.

When the commissioner has taken possession of a state bank, the commissioner shall be vested with the full and exclusive power of management and control, including the power to continue or to discontinue the business, to stop or to limit the payment of its obligations, to employ any necessary assistants, to execute any instrument in the name of the bank, to commence, defend and conduct in its name any action or proceeding in which it may be a party, to terminate the commissioner's possession by restoring the bank to its board of directors, to appoint a receiver to have all of the rights, powers, duties and obligations granted to the commissioner in possession for the purpose of liquidation or reorganization, and to reorganize or liquidate the bank in accordance with §§ 45-2-1503 and 45-2-1504. As soon as practicable after taking possession, the commissioner shall make an inventory of the assets and file a copy of the inventory with the court in which the notice of possession was filed.

When the commissioner has taken possession, there shall be a postponement until six (6) months after the commencement of possession of the date upon which any period of limitation fixed by a statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the bank, or upon which an appeal must be taken or a pleading or other document must be filed by the bank in any pending action or proceeding.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, an emergency exists that will result in serious losses to the depositors, the commissioner may take possession of a state bank without a prior hearing. Any person aggrieved and directly affected by this action of the commissioner may have a review by certiorari as provided in title 27, chapter 9.

If the commissioner determines to liquidate the state bank, the commissioner shall give notice of the determination to the directors, stockholders, depositors and known creditors. Upon a determination to liquidate, the commissioner may, with ex parte approval of the court in which the notice of possession was filed, sell all or any part of the state bank's assets to another state or national bank or to the federal deposit insurance corporation. The commissioner may also, with ex parte approval of the court, borrow from the federal deposit insurance corporation any amount necessary to facilitate the assumption of deposit liabilities by a newly chartered or existing bank and may assign any part or all of the assets of the state bank as security for the loan.

If the commissioner determines to reorganize the state bank, after according a hearing to all interested parties, the commissioner shall enter an order proposing a reorganization plan. A copy of the plan shall be sent to each depositor and creditor who will not receive payment of a claim in full under the plan, together with notice that, unless within fifteen (15) days the plan is disapproved in writing by persons holding one-third (1/3) or more of the aggregate amount of the claims, the commissioner will proceed to effect the reorganization. A department, agency or political subdivision of this state holding a claim that will not be paid in full is authorized to participate as any other creditor.

No judgment, lien or attachment shall be executed upon any asset of the state bank while it is in the possession of the commissioner. Upon the election of the commissioner in connection with a liquidation or reorganization:

Any lien or attachment, other than an attorney's or mechanic's lien, obtained upon any asset of the state bank during the commissioner's possession or within four (4) months prior to commencement thereof shall be vacated except liens created by the commissioner while in possession; and

Any transfer of an asset of the state bank made after or in contemplation of its insolvency with intent to effect a preference shall be voided.

The commissioner may borrow money in the name of the state bank and may pledge its assets as security for the loan.

All necessary and reasonable expenses of the commissioner's possession of a state bank and of its reorganization or liquidation shall be defrayed from the assets thereof.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.502); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-902; Acts 1980, ch. 510, §§ 2-4; 1999, ch. 112, § 14.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 59, 60.

45-2-1503. Requirements of reorganization plan.

A plan of reorganization shall not be prescribed under this chapter unless:

The plan is feasible and fair to all classes of depositors, creditors and stockholders;

The face amount of the interest accorded to any class of depositors, creditors or stockholders under the plan does not exceed the value of the assets upon liquidation, less the full amount of the claims of all prior classes, subject, however, to any fair adjustment for new capital that any class will pay in under the plan;

The plan provides for the issuance of common stock in an amount that will provide an adequate ratio to deposits;

Any exchange of new common stock for obligations or stock of the bank will be effected in inverse order to the priorities in liquidation of the classes that will retain an interest in the bank and upon terms that fairly adjust any change in the relative interest of the respective classes that will be produced by the exchange;

The plan assures the removal of any director, officer or employee responsible for any unsound or unlawful action or the existence of an unsound condition; and

Any merger or consolidation provided by the plan conforms to the requirements this chapter and chapter 1 of this title.

Whenever, in the course of reorganization, supervening conditions render the plan unfair or its execution impractical, the commissioner may modify the plan or liquidate the institution. The action shall be taken by order upon appropriate notice.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.503); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-903.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 61.

45-2-1504. Liquidation by commissioner.

In liquidating a state bank, the commissioner may exercise any power of the office of commissioner, but shall not, without the approval of the court in which notice of possession has been filed:

Sell any asset of the organization having a value in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);

Compromise or release any claim if the amount of the claim exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), exclusive of interest; or

Make any payment on any claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the commissioner, before preparing and filing a schedule of the commissioner's determinations in accordance with this chapter.

Within six (6) months of the commencement of liquidation, the commissioner may elect to terminate any executory contract under which the state bank has contracted either to receive or to provide services, the services specifically including advertising, or any obligation of the bank as a lessee. A lessor who receives sixty (60) days' notice of the commissioner's election to terminate the lease shall have no claim for rent other than rent accrued to the date of termination or for claims for damages for the termination.

As soon after the commencement of liquidation as is practicable, the commissioner shall take the necessary steps to terminate all fiduciary positions held by the state bank and take any action necessary to surrender all property held by the bank as a fiduciary and to settle its fiduciary accounts. The fiduciary accounts may be transferred by the commissioner to another qualified corporate fiduciary as determined by the commissioner, and notice of the transfer must be given by registered mail to the parties by the transferee corporate fiduciary.

As soon after the commencement of liquidation as practicable, the commissioner shall send notice of the liquidation to each known depositor, creditor and lessee of a safe deposit box or bailor of property held by the bank at the address shown on the books of the institution. The notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the community once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The commissioner shall send with the notice a statement of the amount shown on the books of the institution to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice shall demand that property held by the bank as bailee or in a safe deposit box be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and that claims of depositors and creditors, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the commissioner before a specified date not earlier than sixty (60) days thereafter in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

Safe deposit boxes, the contents of which have not been removed before the date specified, shall be opened by the commissioner in the manner provided for boxes upon which the payment of rental is in default, and the sealed packages containing the contents and the certificates, together with any unclaimed property held by the bank as bailee and certified inventories thereof, shall be reported to the state treasurer who shall deal with them in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29.

Within six (6) months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims or a longer period that may be allowed by the court in which notice of possession has been filed, the commissioner shall:

Reject any claim if the commissioner doubts the validity thereof;

Determine the amount, if any, owing to each known creditor or depositor and the priority class of the claim under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title;

Prepare a schedule of the commissioner's determinations for filing in the court in which notice of possession was filed; and

Notify each person whose claim has not been allowed in full and publish once a week for three (3) successive weeks a notice of the time when and the place where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date, not sooner than thirty (30) days thereafter, when the commissioner will file the schedule in court.

Within twenty (20) days after the filing of the commissioner's schedule, any creditor, depositor or stockholder may file an objection to any determination made. Any objections so filed shall be heard and determined by the court, upon such notice to the commissioner and interested claimants as the court may prescribe. If the objection is sustained, the court shall direct an appropriate modification of the schedule. After filing the schedule, the commissioner may, from time to time, make partial distribution to the holders of claims that are undisputed or have been allowed by the court, if a proper reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as is practicable after the determination of all objections, the commissioner shall make final distribution.

The following claims shall have priority:

Obligations incurred by the commissioner;

Wages and salaries of officers and employees earned during the three-month period preceding the commissioner's possession in an amount not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600) for any one (1) person;

Fees and assessments due to the department; and

Deposits to the extent of ten dollars ($10.00) for each depositor.

After the payment of all other claims with interest at the maximum rate permitted on time deposits, the commissioner shall pay claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed.

If the sum available for any class is insufficient to provide payment in full, the sum shall be distributed to the claimants in the class pro rata.

Any assets remaining after all claims have been paid shall be distributed to the stockholders in accordance with their respective interests.

Unclaimed funds remaining after completion of the liquidation shall be transferred to the state treasurer to be dealt with in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29.

When the assets have been distributed in accordance with this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, the commissioner shall file an account with the court. Upon approval thereof, the commissioner shall be relieved of liability in connection with the liquidation and the charter shall be cancelled.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.504); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1978, ch. 561, § 34; T.C.A., § 45-904; Acts 1983, ch. 78, §§ 10, 11; 1999, ch. 112, § 15; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 60, 63.

45-2-1505. Formation of new bank.

Upon application of either five (5) individual incorporators or a bank holding company domiciled in this state, the commissioner may grant a charter and may issue a certificate of authority to the incorporators if the commissioner finds that the immediate formation of a new state bank will protect the depositors of a state bank closed in accordance with § 45-2-1502.

The requirements contained in this chapter pertaining to the formation and operation of a state bank shall not be applicable for a period of one (1) year after formation of a new state bank hereunder, unless the commissioner determines that the requirements are necessary to the operation of the new state bank.

None of the restrictions contained in the Bank Structure Act of 1974, compiled in part 14 of this chapter, or as the same may be hereafter amended, shall apply to the formation of the new state bank.

The new state bank may acquire all or any part of the assets or deposits of a closed bank in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 510, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 56, 61.